Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 8 Registration of Outboard Motors

46-8-1.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall be construed as follows:

“Licensing authority” means the department of environmental management.

“Outboard motor” means any marine motor not permanently fastened to a boat so as to be an integral part of the boat and/or any marine motor which is portable.

“Territorial limits” has the same meaning as defined in §

42-1-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3482, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

46-8-1

; P.L. 1985, ch. 370, § 2.

46-8-2.
Registration of motors required.

Any person who is the owner of an outboard motor for use on any waters within the territorial limits of the State of Rhode Island shall register the outboard motor as provided in §

46-8-3

within ten (10) days after the ownership is acquired.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3482, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

46-8-2

.

46-8-3.
Issuance of registration certificate.

The licensing authority shall, upon application of any owner of an outboard motor to be used on the territorial waters of the State of Rhode Island, issue a registration certificate to that person.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3482, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

46-8-3

; P.L. 1985, ch. 370, § 2.

46-8-4.
Form and contents of registration certificate.

The registration certificate shall be in a form to be prescribed by the director, and shall indicate the name, address, and signature of the owner of the outboard motor, together with the horsepower, serial, and motor numbers, or other identification numbers of the motor; provided, however, that if no identification numbers appear upon the outboard motor, the licensing authority may assign a number to the motor upon sufficient documentation of ownership.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3482, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

46-8-4

; P.L. 1985, ch. 370, § 2.

46-8-5.
Registration fees.

A fee of twenty dollars ($20.00) shall be charged for the registration certificate; provided, however, that registrations obtained for use by the United States or any agency thereof or the State of Rhode Island or any city or town shall be exempt from payment of any fee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3482, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

46-8-5

; P.L. 1985, ch. 370, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 33, § 10.

46-8-6.
Notice of sale, loss, or destruction of motor.

Within seven (7) days after an outboard motor has been sold, assigned, lost, or destroyed, the owner of the outboard motor shall notify the licensing authorities of the town or city in which the outboard motor is registered. The licensing authorities shall then note the information on its copy of the certificate of registration and forward the information to the attorney general, who shall do likewise on his or her copy of the certificate of registration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3482, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

46-8-6

.

46-8-7.
Penalty for violations.

Any person who violates the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall pay a fine of not less than ten dollars ($10.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3482, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

46-8-7

.

46-8-8.
Altered or removed serial numbers — Penalties — Replacement identification numbers.

Whoever removes, defaces, alters, changes, destroys, obliterates, or mutilates, or causes to be removed or destroyed or in any way defaced, altered, changed, obliterated, or mutilated, the identification number of the manufacturer of a motor or engine designed for use in or on a boat, with intent thereby to conceal the identity of the motor or engine, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both. Whoever possesses, sells, or otherwise disposes of or attempts to sell or otherwise dispose of such motor or engine, knowing or having reason to believe that the identifying number or numbers on the motor or engine have been so removed, defaced, altered, changed, destroyed, obliterated, or mutilated, shall be punished by the same fine or imprisonment or both.

This section shall not prohibit the restoration by an owner of an original serial, engine, or other number or mark when the restoration is made under permit issued by the director of the department of environmental management, or the director’s designee, nor prevent any manufacturer from placing, in the ordinary course of business, numbers or marks upon a motor or engine or parts thereof.

Any person who has in his or her possession any motor or engine or any part thereof, the identifying number or numbers of which have been removed, defaced, altered, changed, destroyed, obliterated, or mutilated, can, on or before January 1, 1980, make application to the director of the department of environmental management for a replacement identification number. Upon a showing that the person in possession thereof is the rightful owner, the identification number shall be attached by the director of the department of environmental management, or the director’s designee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 247, § 1.